pt-BR: Norma de segurança para colas: Em conformidade com a ASTM D-4236; Atóxico; Atóxico (ACMI); Atóxico (Com certificado AP); Não especificado; Outro
zh-TW: 膠水安全標準: 符合 ASTM D-4236 標準; 無毒; 無毒 (ACMI 認證); 無毒 (AP 認證); 未指定; 其他
fr: Norme de sécurité de la colle: Conforme à la norme ASTM D-4236; Non toxique; Non toxique (ACMI); Non toxique (certifié AP); Non spécifié; Autre
ko: 접착제 안전 표준: ASTM D-4236 규격 준수; 무독성; 무독성(ACMI); 무독성(AP 인증); 지정되지 않음; 기타
en: Glue safety standard: Conforms to ASTM D-4236; Non-toxic; Non-toxic (ACMI); Non-toxic (AP Certified); Not specified; Other
pl: Norma bezpieczeństwa kleju: Zgodność z normą ASTM D-4236; Nietoksyczny; Nietoksyczny (ACMI); Nietoksyczny (certyfikat AP); Nie określono; Inny
ru: Стандарт безопасности клея: Соответствует ASTM D-4236; Нетоксичный; Нетоксичный (ACMI); Нетоксичный (сертификат AP); Не указано; Другое
cs: Bezpečnostní norma lepidla: Odpovídá normě ASTM D-4236; Netoxické; Netoxické (ACMI); Netoxické (certifikace AP); Nespecifikováno; Ostatní
vi: Tiêu chuẩn an toàn của keo: Tuân thủ ASTM D-4236; Không độc hại; Không độc hại (ACMI); Không độc hại (Chứng nhận AP); Không xác định; Khác
ro-RO: Standard de siguranță pentru lipici: Conform ASTM D-4236; Netoxic; Netoxic (ACMI); Netoxic (certificare AP); Nespecificat; Altele
th: มาตรฐานความปลอดภัยของกาว: เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน ASTM D-4236; ปลอดสารพิษ; ปลอดสารพิษ (ACMI); ปลอดสารพิษ (รับรองโดย AP); ไม่ได้ระบุ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Klijų saugos standartas: Atitinka ASTM D-4236 standartą; Netoksiškas; Netoksiškas (ACMI); Netoksiškas (AP sertifikuotas); Nenurodyta; Kita
bg-BG: Стандарт за безопасност на лепилото: Отговаря на стандарта ASTM D-4236; Нетоксичен; Нетоксичен (ACMI); Нетоксичен (AP сертифициран); Не е посочено; Друго
es: Norma de seguridad del pegamento: Cumple con ASTM D-4236; No tóxico; No tóxico (ACMI); No tóxico (certificado AP); No especificado; Otro
sv: Säkerhetsstandard för lim: Följer ASTM D-4236; Giftfri; Giftfri (ACMI); Giftfri (AP-certifierad); Ej angiven; Annan
it: Standard di sicurezza per la colla: Conforme a ASTM D-4236; Atossico; Atossico (ACMI); Atossico (certificato AP); Non specificato; Altro
fi: Liiman turvallisuusstandardi: Täyttää ASTM D-4236 -standardin; Myrkytön; Myrkytön (ACMI); Myrkytön (AP-sertifioitu); Ei määritetty; Muu
pt-PT: Norma de segurança para colas: Em conformidade com ASTM D-4236; Não tóxico; Não tóxico (ACMI); Não tóxico (certificação AP); Não especificado; Outro
nl: Lijm veiligheidsnorm: Voldoet aan ASTM D-4236; Niet-giftig; Niet-giftig (ACMI); Niet-giftig (AP-gecertificeerd); Niet gespecificeerd; Anders
hu: Ragasztó biztonsági szabványa: Megfelel az ASTM D-4236 szabványnak; Nem mérgező; Nem mérgező (ACMI); Nem mérgező (AP-tanúsított); Nincs megadva; Egyéb
tr: Yapıştırıcı güvenlik standardı: ASTM D-4236 standartlarına uygundur; Toksik değildir; Toksik değildir (ACMI); Toksik değildir (AP Sertifikalı); Belirtilmemiş; Diğer
ja: 接着剤の安全基準: ASTM D-4236準拠; 非毒性; 非毒性 (ACMI); 非毒性 (AP認定); 指定なし; その他
el: Πρότυπο ασφαλείας κόλλας: Συμμορφώνεται με το ASTM D-4236; Μη τοξικό; Μη τοξικό (ACMI); Μη τοξικό (πιστοποίηση AP); Δεν καθορίζεται; Άλλο
zh-CN: 胶水安全标准: 符合 ASTM D-4236 标准; 无毒; 无毒 (ACMI); 无毒（AP 认证）; 未指定; 其他
da: Sikkerhedsstandard for lim: Overholder ASTM D-4236; Ikke-giftig; Ikke-giftig (ACMI); Ikke-giftig (AP-certificeret); Ikke angivet; Anden
hr-HR: Standard sigurnosti ljepila: Sukladno s ASTM D-4236; Netoksično; Netoksično (ACMI); Netoksično (certifikat AP); Nije navedeno; Ostalo
de: Klebstoffsicherheitsnorm: Entspricht ASTM D-4236; Ungiftig; Ungiftig (ACMI); Ungiftig (AP-zertifiziert); Nicht angegeben; Andere
sl-SI: Varnostni standard za lepilo: V skladu z ASTM D-4236; Nestrupeno; Nestrupeno (ACMI); Nestrupeno (certifikat AP); Ni določeno; Drugo
sk-SK: Bezpečnostná norma lepidla: Spĺňa normu ASTM D-4236; Netoxické; Netoxické (ACMI); Netoxické (certifikát AP); Nešpecifikované; Iné
nb: Sikkerhetsstandard for lim: Samsvarer med ASTM D-4236; Ikke-giftig; Ikke-giftig (ACMI); Ikke-giftig (AP-sertifisert); Ikke spesifisert; Annet